Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Chapter 34. Certification of Agricultural Products.

§ 3.2-3400.
Request of parties financially interested; fees to be deposited in Fund.

In order to promote, protect, further, and develop the agricultural interests of the Commonwealth, the Commissioner may, when requested by parties financially interested in a lot of any agricultural products, investigate and certify the quality, condition, grade, or other classification of such agricultural product, pursuant to regulations adopted by the Board, including prescribing payment of fees as the Commissioner deems reasonable for the services provided by employees or licensed agents of the Department.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Certification of Agricultural Products Trust Fund, hereafter referred to as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All moneys levied and collected pursuant to subsection A and §

3.2-4606

shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-28, 3-29; 1966, c. 702, §§ 3.1-28, 3.1-29; 2008, c. 860.

Research References.

Agricultural Law (Matthew Bender). Harl.

§ 3.2-3401.
Licensing of agents.

The Commissioner may license as inspectors persons not in the employ of the Department. No person who is not an employee of the Department may act as a licensed inspector under this chapter unless samples from commodities graded or inspected by him are regularly graded or inspected by an employee of the Department, or of the U.S. Department of Agriculture.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-30; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-30; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-3402.
Certificates as evidence.

Certificates of inspection and reinspection issued under this chapter by authorized agents of the Department and those relating to the grade, classification, quality, or condition of agricultural products issued under authority of the Congress of the United States shall be accepted in any court of the Commonwealth as prima facie evidence of the true grade, classification, condition, or quality of such agricultural product at the time of its inspection.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-31; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-31; 2008, c. 860.